app/polish.aff
flag *F:

# Czasowniki dokonane -- czas przesz³y i tryb przypuszczaj±cy

	L E C			>	-C,G£EM		#zalec (15a)
	L E C			>	-C,G£E¦
	L E C			>	-C,G£
	L E C			>	-C,G£AM
	L E C			>	-C,G£A¦
	L E C			>	-C,G£A
#	L E C			>	-C,G£OM		#nie-ort
#	L E C			>	-C,G£O¦		#nie-ort
	L E C			>	-C,G£O
	L E C			>	-C,GLI¦MY
	L E C			>	-C,GLI¦CIE
	L E C			>	-C,GLI
	L E C			>	-C,G£Y¦MY
	L E C			>	-C,G£Y¦CIE
	L E C			>	-C,G£Y
	L E C			>	-C,G£BYM
	L E C			>	-C,G£BY¦
	L E C			>	-C,G£BY
	L E C			>	-C,G£ABYM
#	L E C			>	-C,G£OBYM	#nie-ort
	L E C			>	-C,G£ABY¦
#	L E C			>	-C,G£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	L E C			>	-C,G£ABY
	L E C			>	-C,G£OBY
	L E C			>	-C,GLIBY¦MY
	L E C			>	-C,GLIBY¦CIE
	L E C			>	-C,GLIBY
	L E C			>	-C,G£YBY¦MY
	L E C			>	-C,G£YBY¦CIE
	L E C			>	-C,G£YBY

	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£EM		#splun±æ, usun±æ, cisn±æ 
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£AM	#(on mnie ci¶nie), machn±æ  (4, 5, 6)
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£E¦
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A¦
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A
#	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OM	#nie-ort
#	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O¦	#nie-ort
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦MY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦MY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦CIE
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦CIE
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y

	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BYM
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABYM
#	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY¦
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY¦
#	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦MY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦CIE
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦CIE
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦MY
	[^DSZ] N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY

	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£EM		#ow³adn±æ (5)
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£AM
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£E¦
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A¦
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A
#	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OM	#nie-ort
#	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦MY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦MY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦CIE
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦CIE
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y

	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BYM
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABYM
#	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY¦
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY¦
#	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦MY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦CIE
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦CIE
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦MY
	[^E] D N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY

	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£EM		#bledn±æ (19) !rzedn±æ
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£E¦
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£AM
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£A¦
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£A
#	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£OM	#nie-ort
#	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£O¦	#nie-ort
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£O
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI¦MY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI¦CIE
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£Y¦MY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£Y¦CIE
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£Y

	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£BYM
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£BY¦
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£BY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£ABYM
#	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£ABY¦
#	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£ABY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£OBY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY¦MY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY¦CIE
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£YBY¦MY
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£YBY¦CIE
	E D N ¡ Æ		>	-EDN¡Æ,AD£YBY
         
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£EM		#lizn±æ (6)
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£AM
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£E¦
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A¦
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A
#	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OM	#nie-ort
#	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦MY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦MY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦CIE
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦CIE
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y

	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BYM
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABYM
#	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY¦
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY¦
#	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦MY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦CIE
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦CIE
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦MY
	[^E] Z N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY

	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£EM		#sczezn±æ (8a)
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£AM
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£E¦
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£A¦
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£A
#	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OM	#nie-ort
#	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£O¦	#nie-ort
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£O
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI¦MY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y¦MY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI¦CIE
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y¦CIE
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LI
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y

	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BYM
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABYM
#	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BY¦
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABY¦
#	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY¦MY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY¦CIE
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,LIBY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY¦CIE
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY¦MY
	E Z N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY

	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£EM		#!gasn±æ, zasn±æ (6)
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£AM
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£E¦
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A¦
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£A
#	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OM	#nie-ort
#	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O¦	#nie-ort
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£O
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦MY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦MY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI¦CIE
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y¦CIE
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLI
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£Y
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BYM
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABYM
#	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY¦
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY¦
#	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-Æ,£BY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£ABY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£OBY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦CIE
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦CIE
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,ÊLIBY¦MY
	[^Ê] S N ¡ Æ		>	-¡Æ,Ê£YBY¦MY

	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£EM 	#klêsn±æ
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£AM
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£E¦
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£A¦
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£A
#	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OM	#nie-ort
#	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£O¦	#nie-ort
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£O
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LI¦MY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y¦MY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LI¦CIE
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y¦CIE
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LI
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£Y
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BYM
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABYM
#	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBYM	#nie-ort
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BY¦
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABY¦
#	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£BY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£ABY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£OBY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LIBY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LIBY¦CIE
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY¦CIE
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-SN¡Æ,¦LIBY¦MY
	Ê S N ¡ Æ		>	-N¡Æ,£YBY¦MY

	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£EM 	#drzeæ (43) !wesprzeæ
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£AM
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£E¦
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£A¦
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£A
#	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OM	#nie-ort
#	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£O¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£O
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI¦MY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y¦MY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI¦CIE
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y¦CIE
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BYM
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABYM
#	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BY¦
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABY¦
#	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY¦CIE
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY¦CIE
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY¦MY
	[^E] . R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY¦MY

	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£EM 	#zemrzeæ (43*)
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£AM
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£E¦
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£A¦
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£A
#	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£OM	#nie-ort
#	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£O¦	#nie-ort
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£O
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLI¦MY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£Y¦MY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLI¦CIE
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£Y¦CIE
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLI
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£Y
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£BYM
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£ABYM
#	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£BY¦
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£ABY¦
#	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£BY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£ABY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£OBY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLIBY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£YBY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLIBY¦CIE
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£YBY¦CIE
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MARLIBY¦MY
	E M R Z E Æ		>	-EMRZEÆ,MAR£YBY¦MY

	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£EM 	#weprzeæ (43*)
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£AM
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£E¦
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£A¦
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£A
#	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£OM	#nie-ort
#	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£O¦	#nie-ort
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£O
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLI¦MY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£Y¦MY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLI¦CIE
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£Y¦CIE
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLI
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£Y
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£BYM
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£ABYM
#	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£BY¦
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£ABY¦
#	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£BY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£ABY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£OBY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLIBY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£YBY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLIBY¦CIE
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£YBY¦CIE
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PARLIBY¦MY
	E P R Z E Æ		>	-EPRZEÆ,PAR£YBY¦MY

	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£EM 	#wetrzeæ (43*)
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£AM
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£E¦
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£A¦
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£A
#	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£OM	#nie-ort
#	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£O¦	#nie-ort
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£O
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLI¦MY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£Y¦MY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLI¦CIE
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£Y¦CIE
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLI
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£Y
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£BYM
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£ABYM
#	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£BY¦
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£ABY¦
#	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£BY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£ABY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£OBY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLIBY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£YBY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLIBY¦CIE
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£YBY¦CIE
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TARLIBY¦MY
	E T R Z E Æ		>	-ETRZEÆ,TAR£YBY¦MY

	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£EM 	#zewrzeæ (43*)
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£AM
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£E¦
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£A¦
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£A
#	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£OM	#nie-ort
#	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£O¦	#nie-ort
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£O
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLI¦MY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£Y¦MY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLI¦CIE
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£Y¦CIE
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLI
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£Y
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£BYM
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£ABYM
#	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£BY¦
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£ABY¦
#	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£BY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£ABY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£OBY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLIBY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£YBY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLIBY¦CIE
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£YBY¦CIE
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WARLIBY¦MY
	E W R Z E Æ		>	-EWRZEÆ,WAR£YBY¦MY

	E D R Z E Æ		>	-EDRZEÆ,DAR£EM 	#zedrzeæ (43*)
	E D R Z E Æ		>	-EDRZEÆ,DAR£AM
	E D R Z E Æ		>	-EDRZEÆ,DAR£E¦
	E D R Z E Æ		>	-EDRZEÆ,DAR£A¦
	E D R Z E Æ		>	-EDRZEÆ,DAR£
